Maryland, session 2026, SB0027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–123.
(a) (1) [A] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A licensee
may not sell, rent, or transfer a regulated firearm until after 7 days following the time a
firearm application is executed by the firearm applicant, in triplicate, and the original is
forwarded by the prospective seller or transferor to the Secretary.
(2) THE REQUIREMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
THAT THE SALE, RENTAL, OR TRANSFER OF A REGULATED FIREARM MAY NOT OCCUR
UNTIL AFTER 7 DAYS FOLLOWING THE TIME AN APPLICATION IS EXECUTED DOES
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0027*

SENATE BILL 27
NOT APPLY TO A SALE, RENTAL, OR TRANSFER OF A REGULATED FIREARM IF THE
INDIVIDUAL WHO PURCHASES, RENTS, OR RECEIVES THE REGULATED FIREARM IS:
(I) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS RETIRED AS A LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER IN GOOD STANDING FROM A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY; OR
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL TO WHOM A PERMIT TO WEAR, CARRY, OR
TRANSPORT A HANDGUN HAS BEEN ISSUED UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(b) A licensee shall complete the sale, rental, or transfer of a regulated firearm
within 90 days after the firearm application was stamped by the Secretary as not being
disapproved.
(c) (1) If the sale, rental, or transfer of a regulated firearm is not completed
within 90 days after the firearm application was stamped by the Secretary as not being
disapproved, a licensee shall return the firearm application to the Secretary within 7 days.
(2) The Secretary shall void a firearm application returned under
paragraph (1) of this subsection as an incomplete sale, rental, or transfer.
(d) (1) (i) A licensee who sells, rents, or transfers a regulated firearm in
compliance with this subtitle shall forward a copy of the written notification of the
completed transaction to the Secretary within 7 days after delivery of the regulated firearm.
(ii) The notification shall contain an identifying description of the
regulated firearm, including its caliber, make, model, any manufacturer’s serial number,
and any other special or peculiar characteristic or marking by which the regulated firearm
may be identified.
(2) The Secretary shall maintain a permanent record of all notifications
received of completed sales, rentals, and transfers of regulated firearms in the State.
5–124.
(a) (1) (I) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
A person who is not a licensee may not sell, rent, transfer, or purchase a regulated firearm
until after 7 days following the time a firearm application is executed by the firearm
applicant, in triplicate, and the original is forwarded by a licensee to the Secretary.
(II) THE REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH THAT A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, RENT, TRANSFER, OR PURCHASE A
REGULATED FIREARM UNTIL 7 DAYS AFTER AN APPLICATION IS EXECUTED DOES

SENATE BILL 27 3
NOT APPLY TO A SALE, RENTAL, OR TRANSFER OF A REGULATED FIREARM IF THE
INDIVIDUAL WHO PURCHASES, RENTS, OR RECEIVES THE REGULATED FIREARM IS:
1. A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER;
2. AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS RETIRED AS A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IN GOOD STANDING FROM A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
OR
3. AN INDIVIDUAL TO WHOM A PERMIT TO WEAR, CARRY,
OR TRANSPORT A HANDGUN HAS BEEN ISSUED UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(2) As an alternative to completing a secondary sale of a regulated firearm
through a licensee, a prospective seller, lessor, or transferor and a prospective purchaser,
lessee, or transferee may complete the transaction through a designated law enforcement
agency.
(b) A firearm applicant for a secondary sale of a regulated firearm through a
licensee shall pay to the licensee a processing fee not exceeding $20.
(c) A person shall complete the sale, rental, or transfer of a regulated firearm
within 90 days after the firearm application was stamped by the Secretary as not being
disapproved.
(d) (1) If the sale, rental, or transfer of a regulated firearm is not completed
within 90 days after the firearm application was stamped by the Secretary as not being
disapproved, a person shall return the firearm application to the Secretary within 7 days.
(2) The Secretary shall void a firearm application returned under
paragraph (1) of this subsection as an incomplete sale, rental, or transfer.
(e) (1) (i) A person who sells, rents, or transfers a regulated firearm in
compliance with this subtitle shall forward a copy of the written notification of the
completed transaction to the Secretary within 7 days after delivery of the regulated firearm.
(ii) The notification shall contain an identifying description of the
regulated firearm, including its caliber, make, model, any manufacturer’s serial number,
and any other special or peculiar characteristic or marking by which the regulated firearm
may be identified.
(2) The Secretary shall maintain a permanent record of all notifications
received of completed sales, rentals, and transfers of regulated firearms in the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.